Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 4. Snowmobiles

Cross references. —

As to operation of snowmobiles on highways, see §

31-5-801

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability based on violation of statute or ordinance specifically regulating operation of snowmobile, 45 ALR3d 1438.

Snowmobile operation as DWI or DUI, 56 ALR4th 1092.

§ 31-2-401.
Definitions.

For purposes of this act:

“Commercial snowmobile” means a snowmobile operated as a nonguided rental snowmobile or a snowmobile leased, rented or operated by a commercial snowmobile outfitter;

“Snowmobile” means any mechanically driven vehicle of a type which utilizes sled type runners, or skis, or any endless belt tread or combination of these, designed primarily for operation over snow;

“Nonresident snowmobile” means any snowmobile that is not a resident snowmobile;

“Resident snowmobile” means any snowmobile:

Titled in Wyoming;

Owned by a Wyoming resident; or

Which is used or kept in Wyoming for more than thirty (30) consecutive days.

“This act” means W.S.

31-2-401

through

31-2-409

.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1994, ch. 81, § 1; 1996, ch. 119, § 2; 2014 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(iii) and (a)(iv); and redesignated former (a)(iii) as present (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-2-402.
Registration selling agents; application for registration.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 50, § 3.

The department of state parks and cultural resources through the division of state parks and historic sites shall in accordance with W.S.

36-4-123

, appoint selling agents to sell snowmobile registrations and user fees. Each selling agent shall retain one dollar ($1.00) for each nonresident user fee sold under W.S. 31-2-409(a)(ii) or for each resident snowmobile registration sold under W.S. 31-2-404(a)(i). Designated department employees may sell snowmobile registrations and user fees, but no employee shall receive any commission on registrations or user fees collected.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 50, § 3.

Except as hereafter provided, every person who owns or uses a resident snowmobile which will be operated within the state of Wyoming shall, for each snowmobile so owned or used file or cause to be filed each year beginning July 1, with any designated selling agent, an application for registration of the snowmobile which shall be in writing in duplicate. The application shall state the name and address of the owner and the name of the applicant and describe the snowmobile, including make, model and any identifying serial numbers located on the snowmobile.

Every person who owns or uses a nonresident snowmobile which will be operated within this state shall, for each snowmobile so owned or used, file or cause to be filed with a designated selling agent each year prior to the operation within the state, an application under W.S.

31-2-409

which states the name and mailing address of the owner of the snowmobile and the name of the applicant.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1992, ch. 50, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 78, § 1; ch. 81, § 1; 1996, ch. 119, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2014 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the second sentence of (b), inserted “nonresident,” inserted “resident snowmobile,” and inserted “under W.S. 31-2-404(a)(i)”; in the first sentence of (d), inserted “resident,” and deleted “registration” preceding “selling agent”; in the second sentence of (d), inserted “and” preceding “identifying serial,” deleted “and whether the snowmobile will be operated for private or commercial use”; deleted the former last two sentences in (d) which read: “At the time of application, the applicant shall also present proof in a form approved by the department of revenue that all sales or use tax due on the snowmobile have been paid. Any person who knowingly presents a false or fraudulent statement of proof is subject to the provisions of W.S. 6 5 303, in addition to any penalties and interest due for nonpayment of sales or use tax on the snowmobile”; and added (e).

§ 31-2-403.
Required registration fee.

The owner of a resident snowmobile which will be operated within the state of Wyoming shall, upon the filing of an application, pay to the selling agent, in cash, money order, certified check or bank draft, a registration fee as provided by W.S.

31-2-404

.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 2014 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “resident” preceding “snowmobile,” and deleted “registration” preceding “selling agent.”

§ 31-2-404.
Amount of fee; ad valorem tax exemption; disposition of fees; duties of department of state parks and cultural resources.

Except as provided in W.S.

31-2-408

, the annual registration fee for a resident snowmobile is:

For a snowmobile intended for private use $35.00;

For a commercial snowmobile $105.00.

Snowmobiles are hereby exempt from any and all ad valorem taxes.

The selling agent shall forward to the department of state parks and cultural resources the original copy of the registration application together with:

The registration fee as provided for in paragraph (a)(i) of this section minus one dollar ($1.00);

The registration fee as provided in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section minus one dollar ($1.00);

All voluntary fees collected under subsection (f) of this section.

Except as provided in this subsection, the fees forwarded to the department of state parks and cultural resources under this section shall be deposited in the snowmobile trails account created by W.S. 31-2-409(c) and may be expended by the department subject to approval by the legislature. All fees collected under paragraph (f)(i) of this section shall be deposited in the search and rescue account created by W.S. 19-13-301(a). All fees collected under paragraph (f)(ii) of this section shall be deposited in the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

The department of state parks and cultural resources of Wyoming shall:

Administer the snowmobile trails program;

Furnish a sufficient quantity of numbered decals and necessary forms to each registration selling agent; and

Keep full and complete records of all registered snowmobiles.

Snowmobile registration forms shall contain information about the voluntary fees under this subsection. In addition to the fees under subsection (a) of this section, persons registering snowmobiles in Wyoming may pay a voluntary fee:

Of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities;

Of any whole dollar amount to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; ch. 97, § 1; 1994, ch. 81, § 1; 1996, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 119, § 2; 1998, ch. 99, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2005, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii), substituted “$75.00” for “$50.00”; and in (c)(ii), substituted “Seventy-four dollars ($74.00)” for “Forty-nine dollars ($49.00).”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (d), substituted “account” for “fund.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “voluntary” following “All” in (c)(iii); added “voluntary” following “pay a” and substituted “two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount” for “one dollar ($1.00)” in (f).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “resident”; in (a)(i), substituted “$35.00” for “$5.00”; in (a)(ii), substituted “$105.00” for “$75.00”; in the introductory paragraph of (c), deleted “registration” preceding “selling agent”; in (c)(i), substituted “The registration” for “Four dollars ($4.00) of each registration,” added “minus one dollar ($1.00)”; and in (c)(ii), substituted “The registration” for “Seventy-four dollars ($74.00) of each registration,” and added “minus one dollar ($1.00).”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) substituted “paragraph (f)(i)” for “subsection (f)” and added the last sentence; and rewrote (f), which read “In addition to the fees under subsection (a) of this section, persons registering snowmobiles in Wyoming may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities. Snowmobile registration forms shall contain information about the voluntary fee under this subsection.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 31-2-405.
Payment of fees; issuance of certificate and decal.

Resident snowmobile registration fees shall be paid before the expiration of thirty (30) days after acquiring ownership of a snowmobile which will be operated within the state of Wyoming. Upon receipt of the registration fee the selling agent shall issue to the owner for each snowmobile a certificate of registration, setting forth the facts in the application, together with a numbered decal which shall bear a distinctive number assigned to the snowmobile and the date of expiration, which decal shall at all times be prominently displayed on the snowmobile.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 30, § 2.

History:

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1990, ch. 97, § 1; 2014 ch. 30, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014,
in (a), added “Resident” at the beginning, substituted “thirty (30)” for “sixteen (16),” deleted
“registration” preceding “selling agent,” inserted “and the date of expiration,” and inserted “decal”; and repealed the former (b) which read “The decal issued under subsection (a) of this section shall contain the following language printed on the face of the decal: “Warning: trespass upon private property while operating a snowmobile is punishable by imprisonment up to six (6) months, a fine up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both under W.S.

6-3-303

.”

§ 31-2-406.
Lost, mutilated or destroyed certificate or decal.

In the event of loss, mutilation or destruction of any resident or nonresident snowmobile certificate issued pursuant to this act, or numbered decal, the owner of a snowmobile may obtain a duplicate certificate or a new numbered decal from any selling agent or any authorized department of state parks and cultural resources employee upon filing an affidavit showing the loss, mutilation or destruction of the original certificate or numbered decal and paying a fee of one-half (1/2) of the applicable current registration or user fee. The selling agent shall forward to the division of parks and historic sites within the department one-half (1/2) of the applicable current registration or user fee minus one dollar ($1.00) of each duplicate certificate fee to be deposited to the general fund. It is unlawful for any person to willfully alter or mutilate any certificate or numbered decal.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1992, ch. 50, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2014 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “registration” preceding “certificate” throughout; in the first sentence, substituted “resident or nonresident snowmobile certificate issued pursuant to this act” for “registration certificate,” deleted “registration” preceding “selling agent,” substituted “one-half (1/2) of the applicable current registration or user fee” for “one dollar ($1.00)”; in the second sentence, deleted “registration” preceding “selling,” and substituted “one-half (1/2) of the applicable current registration or user fee minus one dollar ($1.00)” for “fifty cent ($.50).”

§ 31-2-407.
Duration of certificate and number.

Every certificate and number issued pursuant to W.S.

31-2-401

through

31-2-409

shall be valid from July 1 of the year designated until June 30 of the following year. The use of license plates or decals issued during any registration year is hereby authorized and legalized until and including the first day of August of the next succeeding registration year.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1996, ch. 119, § 2.

§ 31-2-408.
Exemptions.

The following snowmobiles are exempt from W.S.

31-2-401

through

31-2-407

:

Mobile track-laying units;

Snowmobiles used solely for business and agricultural purposes; and

Nonresident snowmobiles, except to the extent a nonresident snowmobile meets the qualifications and requirements set forth in W.S. 31-2-402(e);

Snowmobiles used exclusively on private land.

This section does not exempt snowmobiles which are leased or rented for hire as commercial snowmobiles as defined under W.S. 31-2-401(a)(i).

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2014 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(iii), substituted “Nonresident snowmobiles, except to the extent a nonresident snowmobile meets the qualifications and requirements set forth in W.S. 31-2-402(e)” for “Snowmobiles owned by out-of-state residents if a valid registration sticker from the owner's state of residence is affixed to those snowmobiles or if the owner can demonstrate other proof of valid registration in his state of residence”; added (a)(v); and in (b), added “for hire as commercial snowmobiles as defined under W.S. 31-2-401(a)(i)” at the end.

§ 31-2-409.
Snowmobile user fee; amount of fee; disposition of fees; account created; duties of department of state parks and cultural resources; duration of decal; exemptions.

There shall be collected by selling agents an annual nonresident snowmobile user fee for nonresident snowmobiles operated in Wyoming as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 30, § 2.

For any nonresident snowmobile not exempt under subsection (f) of this section $35.00.

The selling agent shall forward to the department of state parks and cultural resources the original copy of the snowmobile user fee form together with:

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 30, § 2.

The snowmobile user fee as provided in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section minus one dollar ($1.00);

All voluntary fees collected under subsection (h) of this section.

There is hereby created a snowmobile trails account. Except as provided in this subsection, the monies collected under this section and forwarded to the department of state parks and cultural resources shall be deposited in the account created by this section and may be expended by the department subject to approval by the legislature for the administration of the snowmobile trails program. All voluntary fees collected under paragraph (h)(i) of this section shall be deposited in the search and rescue account created by W.S. 19-13-301(a). All fees collected under paragraph (h)(ii) of this section shall be deposited in the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall:

Administer the snowmobile trails program;

Furnish a sufficient quantity of numbered decals and necessary forms to each selling agent;

Keep a full and complete record of all snowmobile user fees collected.

The annual nonresident snowmobile user fee numbered decal shall be valid from July 1 of the year designated until June 30 of the following year, with the date of expiration prominently displayed on the decal.

The nonresident snowmobile user fee prescribed by paragraph (a)(ii) of this section may be waived on an annual basis by the director of the department of state parks and cultural resources in an area designated by the department through a cooperative agreement whereby other governmental agencies agree to contribute to the snowmobile trail maintenance and grooming for that area.

The decal issued under this section shall be prominently displayed on the exterior of the snowmobile.

Snowmobile user fee forms shall contain information about the voluntary fees under this subsection. In addition to the fees under subsection (a) of this section, persons paying a user fee for snowmobiles in Wyoming may pay a voluntary fee:

Of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities;

Of any whole dollar amount to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 119, § 1; 1997, ch. 115, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2005, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 30, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), substituted “$20.00” for “$10.00”; in (a)(ii), substituted “$25.00” for “$15.00”; and in (b)(ii), substituted “Twenty-four dollars ($24.00)” for “Fourteen dollars ($14.00).”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (c), substituted “account” for “fund within the enterprise fund” in the first sentence, and “account” for “fund” in the second sentence.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b)(iii); added “Except as provided in this subsection,” preceding “the monies”; added the last sentence in (c); and added (h).

T

he 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), deleted “In addition to the registration fees required under W.S.

31-2-403

” preceding “There shall be,” deleted “registration” preceding “selling agents,” inserted “nonresident,” and inserted “for nonresident snowmobiles operated in Wyoming”; repealed former (a)(i), which read: “For a snowmobile owned by a Wyoming resident for which the registration fee under
W.S. 31-2-404(a)(i) has been paid
. . . . .
$20.00”; in (a)(ii), substituted “nonresident” for “other,” and substituted “$35.00” for “$25.00”; in the introductory paragraph of (b), deleted “registration” preceding “selling agent”; repealed former (b)(i), which read: “The amount required under
W.S. 31-2-404(c)(i) and snowmobile user fee as provided in paragraph (a)(i) of this section.”; in (b)(ii), substituted “The snowmobile” for “Twenty-four dollars ($24.00) of each snowmobile,” and added “minus one dollar ($1.00)”; in (d)(ii), deleted “registration” preceding “selling agent”; in (e), inserted “nonresident,” and added “with the date of expiration prominently
displayed on the decal”; and in (f), deleted the former first sentence which read: “Snowmobiles for which registration fees have been paid under W.S. 31 2 404(a)(ii) and snowmobiles exempt under W.S. 31 2 408(a)(i) and (ii) are exempt from the provisions of this section”; and in the present first sentence of (f), inserted “nonresident.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) substituted “paragraph (h)(i)” for “subsection (h)” and added the last sentence; and rewrote (h) which read, “In addition to the fees under subsection (a) of this section, persons paying a user fee for snowmobiles in Wyoming may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities. Snowmobile user fee forms shall contain information about the voluntary fee under this subsection.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”